zh-TW: 心率感測技術: ECG; 光學 (PPG); 其他
fi: Sydämen sykkeen mittaustekniikka: EKG; Optinen (PPG); Muu
it: Tecnologia di rilevamento della frequenza cardiaca: ECG; Ottico (PPG); Altro
ko: 심박수 감지 기술: ECG; 광학(PPG); 기타
de: Technologie zur Herzfrequenzerfassung: EKG; Optisch (PPG); Sonstige
vi: Công nghệ cảm biến nhịp tim: ECG; Quang học (PPG); Khác
th: เทคโนโลยีตรวจวัดอัตราการเต้นของหัวใจ: ECG; ออปติคอล (PPG); อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tecnologia de sensor de frequência cardíaca: ECG; Ótica (PPG); Outra
sv: Teknik för pulsmätning: EKG; Optisk (PPG); Övrigt
pt-BR: Tecnologia do sensor de frequência cardíaca: ECG; Óptica (PPG); Outra
da: Teknologi til pulsmåling: EKG; Optisk (PPG); Andet
en: Heart rate sensing technology: ECG; Optical (PPG); Other
cs: Technologie snímání tepové frekvence: EKG; Optická (PPG); Jiné
bg-BG: Технология за измерване на сърдечния ритъм: ЕКГ; Оптична (PPG); Други
sk-SK: Technológia snímania srdcovej frekvencie: EKG; Optické (PPG); Iné
tr: Kalp atış hızı algılama teknolojisi: EKG; Optik (PPG); Diğer
ro-RO: Tehnologie de detectare a ritmului cardiac: ECG; Optic (PPG); Altele
pl: Technologia pomiaru tętna: EKG; Optyczne (PPG); Inna
ru: Технология измерения пульса: ЭКГ; Оптический (ФПГ); Другое
hu: Pulzusmérő technológia: EKG; Optikai (PPG); Egyéb
hr-HR: Tehnologija mjerenja otkucaja srca: EKG; Optički (PPG); Ostalo
nb: Teknologi for pulsmåling: EKG; Optisk (PPG); Annet
zh-CN: 心率传感技术: ECG（心电图）; 光学 (PPG); 其他
nl: Hartslag detectietechnologie: ECG; Optisch (PPG); Overig
lt-LT: Širdies ritmo matavimo technologija: EKG; Optinė (PPG); Kita
fr: Technologie de détection de la fréquence cardiaque: ECG; Optique (PPG); Autre
el: Τεχνολογία ανίχνευσης καρδιακού ρυθμού: ECG; Οπτική (PPG); Άλλη
ja: 心拍数感知技術: ECG; 光学式 (PPG); その他
sl-SI: Tehnologija zaznavanja srčnega utripa: EKG; Optično (PPG); Drugo
es: Tecnología de detección de ritmo cardíaco: ECG; Óptico (PPG); Otro